Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,139
Certification required; when.

On and after two years following August 30, 1987, unless the director determines that an emergency exists, it shall be unlawful for any wastewater treatment facility to be operated unless its operator is duly certified under the Wastewater Treatment Operator Certification Act at the level of classification of the facility to be operated.

Laws 1987, LB 533, § 12.